Tennessee, session 114, SB2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Violent Criminal Court Act."
SB2146
010221
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-2-506(30), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(F)
(i) Effective September 1, 2026, there is created in the thirtieth judicial
district two (2) additional criminal courts to be designated as violent criminal
courts. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as judge of each of the
violent criminal courts, and the person so appointed shall serve in that capacity
until September 1, 2028, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified.
At the August 2028 general election, the qualified voters of the thirtieth judicial
district shall elect, in accordance with § 16-2-505, one (1) person to serve as
judge of each violent criminal court created by this subdivision (30)(F)(i). The
person so elected at the August 2028 general election shall hold office until
September 1, 2030, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified.
Thereafter, the judges of the violent criminal courts shall be elected for a full
eight-year term;
(ii) The presiding judge is directed to address caseload backlogs in the
criminal courts by transferring cases involving criminal offenses set forth in § 40-
35-501(aa), (bb), and (cc) to the violent criminal courts for disposition;
(iii) Effective September 1, 2026, the district attorney general of the
thirtieth judicial district is entitled to four (4) assistant district attorney positions
and two (2) criminal investigator positions that are in addition to those positions
provided pursuant to subdivision (30)(B);
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010221